Illinois, session 104th, HB3867.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $3,500,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Build Illinois 6Bond Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity for a grant to the Family YMCA of Northwest 8Illinois for the costs associated with the purchase of a 9building and other capital improvements. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.